Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4084.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 14b. (1) The department shall create and operate a noise
abatement measure program to provide funding for the construction
and maintenance of noise abatement measures to reduce highway noise
along state trunk line highways in areas where no noise abatement
measures currently exist. Through the program, the department shall
do 1 or more of the following, subject to subsection (9):
(a) Construct or maintain noise abatement measures at the
request of local road authorities.
(b) Provide grants or loans to local road authorities for the
JJR H00387'25 (H-2) vi9yfj


construction or maintenance of noise abatement measures.
(2) The department shall, after consulting with any
transportation stakeholders the department considers relevant,
establish a review process for considering applications under this
section and post the review process on its website. The review
process must, at a minimum, do all of the following:
(a) Include an identification of criteria, the weight of each
criterion, and a scoring system to score each project based on the
weighted criteria. The scoring system may consider project
readiness, but project readiness must not be a major factor in
determining the final score. The scoring system must consider the
feasibility, reasonableness, and cost-effectiveness of the project,
including, but not limited to, a consideration of all of the
following with greater weight given to subparagraphs (i), (ii), and
(iii):
(i) The cost-effectiveness of the project.
(ii) The number of residential units that will receive not less
than 5 decibels of noise reduction.
(iii) The existing noise level at the site of the project.
(iv) The presence of nonresidential, high-use areas such as
parks, schools, playgrounds, or recreation centers that will
receive not less than 5 decibels of noise reduction.
(b) Identify and apply any other relevant criteria contained
in state or federal law.
(c) Describe minimum requirements for when the department must
conduct a noise study related to an application.
(d) Involve local road authorities and other transportation
stakeholders, as appropriate, in the process of scoring and ranking
projects.
JJR H00387'25 (H-2) vi9yfj


(e) Publicize scoring and decision outcomes concerning each
project, including the projects that were considered but not
selected, and the reason each project was not selected.
(3) A local road authority may submit an application for the
program to request that the department construct or maintain a
noise abatement measure or to request a grant or loan to fund the
construction or maintenance of a noise abatement measure by the
local road authority. An application must be made on a form
approved by the department and must contain the information
required by the department. An application may be made at any time
as determined by the department. The department shall notify a
local road authority that submits an application whether the
application is approved or rejected. Before providing a grant or
loan under this section, the department must enter into a written
agreement with the local road authority that includes the terms of
the grant or loan and describes the project that will be funded by
the grant or loan. A grant or loan under this section may be used
by the local road authority for any stage of design, construction,
or maintenance of a noise abatement measure.
(4) For each year in which the department receives
applications, the department shall report by not later than
December 1 to the standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives with primary jurisdiction over transportation
issues and to the senate and house of representatives
appropriations committees on the utilization of the program. The
report must include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) The number of applications received under this section.
(b) The name of each local road authority that submitted an
application and whether each application was approved or rejected.
JJR H00387'25 (H-2) vi9yfj


(c) A summary description of each project that was the subject
of an application.
(5) The noise abatement measure fund is created in the state
treasury.
(6) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and
earnings from the investments to the fund.
(7) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits
of the fund.
(8) The department shall expend money from the fund, on
appropriation, only to create and operate the program as provided
in this section.
(9) A single project shall not be funded by more than 5% of
the amount of the money remaining in the fund when the project is
approved to receive money from the fund.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Fund" means the noise abatement measure fund created in
subsection (5).
(b) "Noise abatement measure" means a noise abatement measure
that reduces highway noise in areas adjacent to a highway,
including, but not limited to, any of the following:
(i) A sound wall.
(ii) Pavement texturing that reduces highway noise through
methods including, but not limited to, overlaying or grinding, or
both.
(iii) An earth berm.
(c) "Program" means the noise abatement measure program
created under subsection (1).
JJR H00387'25 (H-2) vi9yfj


(d) "Project" means a noise abatement measure project.
Final Page
JJR H00387'25 (H-2) vi9yfj